Utah statutes.
26A-1-124.   Religious exemptions.

This part does not authorize a local health department to impose on any person any mode of treatment inconsistent with the creed or tenets of any religious denomination of which the person is an adherent, provided the person complies with sanitary and quarantine laws, rules, and regulations.

